New Jersey, session 222, A5554.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. The following language provision is added to section 1 of P.L.2026, c.27, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027: 34 DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION 30 Educational, Cultural, and Intellectual Development 31 Direct Educational Services and Assistance STATE AID In addition to the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Nonpublic School Aid and subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $2,000,000 to provide aid to nonpublic schools that did not complete the Nonpublic School Enrollment Report for the receipt of Nonpublic Textbook Aid, Nonpublic Nursing Services Aid, Nonpublic Security Aid, and Nonpublic Technology Initiative aid in fiscal year 2027.  Aid pursuant to this paragraph shall be: (1) provided on a first-come, first-serve basis pursuant to an application process to be developed by the Commissioner of Education; (2) made available until the additional amounts authorized pursuant to this paragraph have been fully expended; and (3) based on the applicable student enrollment information, and the applicable per pupil amounts, as provided in this act for Nonpublic Textbook Aid, Nonpublic Nursing Services Aid, Nonpublic Security Aid, and Nonpublic Technology Initiative. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.